Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. Department of Historic Resources.
§ 10.1-2211.1.
Disbursement of funds appropriated for caring for Revolutionary War cemeteries and graves.

At the direction of the Director, the Comptroller of the Commonwealth is instructed and empowered to draw annual warrants upon the State Treasurer from any sums that may be provided in the general appropriation act, in favor of the treasurers of the Virginia Society of the Sons of the American Revolution (VASSAR) and the Revolutionary War memorial associations caring for cemeteries as set forth in subsection B. Such sums shall be expended by the associations for the routine maintenance of their respective Revolutionary War cemeteries and graves and for the graves of Revolutionary War soldiers and sailors not otherwise cared for in other cemeteries and in erecting and caring for markers, memorials, and monuments to the memory of such soldiers, sailors, and persons rendering service to the Patriot cause in the Revolutionary War. All such associations, through their proper officers, are required after July 1 of each year to submit to the Director a certified statement that the funds disbursed to the association or organization in the preceding fiscal year were or will be expended for the routine maintenance of cemeteries and graves specified in this section and in erecting and caring for markers, memorials, and monuments to the memory of such soldiers, sailors, and persons rendering service to the Patriot cause in the Revolutionary War. If a cemetery association fails to comply with any of the requirements of this section, such association shall be prohibited from receiving moneys allocated under this section for all subsequent fiscal years until the association fully complies with the requirements. No retroactive disbursement of funds for any preceding year shall be made. The Director shall deposit any appropriated funds that are not disbursed during the same fiscal year into the Revolutionary War Cemeteries and Graves Fund created pursuant to §

10.1-2211.1:1

.

Allocation of appropriations made pursuant to this section shall be based on the number of graves, monuments, and markers as set forth opposite the cemetery name, or as documented by each association multiplied by the rate of $5 or the average actual cost of routine maintenance, whichever is greater, for each grave, monument, or marker in the care of a cemetery association. For the purposes of this section, the “average actual cost of care” shall be determined by the Department in a biennial survey of at least four properly maintained cemeteries, each located in a different geographical region of the Commonwealth.

Click to view

In addition to any sums that may be provided in favor of the associations as set forth in subsection B, the Director shall disburse funds at the same rate to VASSAR to fund its maintenance of no more than 6,000 additional Revolutionary War graves in the Commonwealth, as documented and certified by VASSAR and set forth in a list submitted annually to the Director.

Any of the associations and societies set forth in subsection B or C may apply to the Director for grants to perform extraordinary maintenance, renovation, repair, or reconstruction of any of their respective Revolutionary War cemeteries and graves and to erect and care for markers, memorials, and monuments to the memory of such soldiers, sailors, and persons rendering service to the Patriot cause in the Revolutionary War. These grants shall be made from any appropriation made available by the General Assembly for such purpose or from the Revolutionary War Cemeteries and Graves Fund created pursuant to §

10.1-2211.1:1

. In making such grants, the Director shall give full consideration to the assistance available from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs or other agencies, except in those instances where such assistance is deemed by the Director to be detrimental to the historical, artistic, or architectural significance of the site.

Local matching funds shall not be required for grants made pursuant to this section.

IN THE COUNTIES OF: NUMBER: Amherst St. Matthews Episcopal Church 3 Augusta Bethel Presbyterian Church 33 Glebe Burying Ground 11 Mossy Creek Cemetery 6 Augusta Stone Presbyterian Church 44 Hebron Presbyterian Church 6 Old Providence Presbyterian Church 20 Rocky Spring Presbyterian Church 4 St. John’s Reformed Lutheran Church 4 St. Peter’s Lutheran Church 3 Tinkling Springs Presbyterian Church 13 Trinity Lutheran Church 8 Botetourt Fincastle Presbyterian Church 28 Campbell Callaway-Steptoe Cemetery 4 Cobbs Hall Farm 3 Concord Presbyterian Church 4 Family Cemetery at Avoca 3 Mount Airy Family Cemetery 3 Haden Family Cemetery on Phillips Farm 3 Hat Creek Presbyterian Church 3 Clarke Old Chapel Churchyard 3 Culpeper Culpeper Cemetery 3 Masonic Cemetery 3 Dinwiddie Sweden Plantation 3 Floyd Pine Creek Cemetery 4 Franklin Tanyard-Benard-Hill Cemetery 3 Greenesville Robinson Family Cemetery 3 Halifax Terry Family Cemetery 5 Hanover Spring Grove Cemetery 5 Henry Leatherwood Plantation 5 Loudoun Ketoctin Cemetery 7 Louisa Little River Baptist Church 3 Nelson Cub Creek Road Cemetery 10 Page Printz Family Cemetery 3 Pittsylvania Buckler Family Cemetery 3 Roanoke Walton Family Cemetery 3 Rockingham Dayton Cemetery 3 Old Peaked Mountain Church 30 Russell Soloman Litton Hollow Cemetery 4 Shenandoah St. Mary’s Lutheran Church 7 Tazewell Thompson Family Cemetery 4 Washington Green Spring Church 6 Sinking Spring Cemetery 9 Wythe St. John’s Lutheran Church 5 St. Paul’s Lutheran Church 4 IN THE CITIES OF: Alexandria Christ Church Cemetery 8 Old Presbyterian Meeting House 43 Fairfax Fairfax City Cemetery 3 Pohick Church Cemetery 3 Washington Family Tomb 3 Fredericksburg Fredericksburg Cemetery 5 Masonic Cemetery 6 St. George’s Episcopal Church 3 Lexington Stonewall Jackson Memorial Cemetery 19 Washington and Lee University 3 Lynchburg Old City Cemetery 3 Newport News Warwick Burial Ground 3 Norfolk St. Paul’s Cemetery 3 Portsmouth Cedar Grove 4 Trinity Episcopal Church 5 Richmond Hollywood Cemetery 4 Shockoe Hill Cemetery 8 St. John’s Episcopal Church 4 Rockbridge Falling Spring Presbyterian Church 6 High Bridge Presbyterian Church 3 New Providence Presbyterian Church 16 Timber Ridge Cemetery 9 Staunton Trinity Episcopal Church 17 Williamsburg Bruton Parish Church 4 Winchester Mount Hebron Cemetery 31 Old Opequon Presbyterian Church 10

History.

2002, c. 256; 2007, c. 349; 2018, cc. 639, 641.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 385 C, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Pursuant to the provisions of §

10.1-2211.1

, Code of Virginia, as amended by Chapter 639, 2018 Session of the General Assembly, out of the amounts provided for Financial Preservation shall be paid $23,100 the first year and $23,100 the second year from the general fund grants to the Virginia Society of the Sons of the American Revolution (VASSAR) and the Revolutionary War memorial associations caring for cemeteries as set forth in subsection B of §

10.1-2211.1

, Code of Virginia. Such sums shall be expended by the associations for the routine maintenance of their respective Revolutionary War cemeteries and graves and for the graves of Revolutionary War soldiers and sailors not otherwise cared for in other cemeteries, and in erecting and caring for markers, memorials, and monuments to the memory of such soldiers, sailors, and persons rendering service to the Patriot cause in the Revolutionary War.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 349 substituted “16” for “15” in the table following “New Providence Presbyterian Church.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 639 and 641 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, inserted “the Virginia Society of the Sons of the American Revolution (VASSAR) and the” in the first sentence, substituted “soldiers, sailors, and persons rendering service to the Patriot cause in the Revolutionary War” for “soldiers and sailors” in the second and third sentences, and substituted “disbursed” for “appropriated” in the third sentence, and added the last two sentences; added subsection C and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; in subsection D, deleted “In addition to funds that may be provided pursuant to subsection B” at the beginning, inserted “or C” and substituted “to erect and care for markers, memorials, and monuments to the memory of such soldiers, sailors, and persons rendering service to the Patriot cause in the Revolutionary War” for “for the graves of Revolutionary War soldiers and sailors” in the first sentence, inserted “or from the Revolutionary War Cemeteries and Graves Fund created pursuant to §

10.1-2211.1:1

” in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes. Subsection C has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 10.1-2211.1:1.
Revolutionary War Cemeteries and Graves Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Revolutionary War Cemeteries and Graves Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds appropriated for such purpose, all funds deposited in the Fund pursuant to subsection A of §

10.1-2211.1

, and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set out in subsection D of §

10.1-2211.1

. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

History.

2018, cc. 639, 641.

§ 10.1-2211.2.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Disbursement of funds appropriated for caring for historical African American cemeteries and graves.

For purposes of this section:“Fund” means the Historical African American Cemeteries and Graves Fund created pursuant to §

10.1-2211.3

.“Historical African American cemetery” means a cemetery that was established prior to January 1, 1900, for interments of African Americans.“Qualified organization” means a charitable corporation, charitable association, or charitable trust that has been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and whose primary purpose is the preservation of historical cemeteries and graves or any person or locality that owns a historical African American cemetery. , or any locality whose purpose for applying for funding pursuant to this section is to maintain a neglected historical African American cemetery, or a portion thereof, that is located within its jurisdictional bounds

At the direction of the Director, the Comptroller of the Commonwealth shall draw an annual warrant upon the State Treasurer from any sum that may be provided to the Department in the general appropriation act for the purpose of maintaining qualifying cemeteries and graves pursuant to this section. Any representative of a qualified organization desiring to receive funding from such appropriation for the maintenance of qualifying cemeteries and graves pursuant to this section shall submit an application to the Department on or before May 30 each year. Such appropriations shall be allocated on the basis of the number of graves, monuments, and markers in a cemetery of African Americans who lived at any time between January 1, 1800, and January 1, 1900, the dates to be determined by reference to grave markers or, at the discretion of the Director, other historical records. Such number of graves, monuments, and markers, as documented by the qualified organization, shall be multiplied by the rate of $5 or the average actual cost of routine maintenance of a grave, monument, or marker, whichever is greater, to determine the amount of the allocation. The Department shall determine the average actual cost of routine maintenance of a grave, monument, or marker in a biennial survey of at least four properly maintained cemeteries, each located in a different geographical region of the Commonwealth. The Director shall deposit any appropriated funds that are not disbursed during the same fiscal year into the Fund.

Click to view

In addition to any sum provided to a qualified organization as set forth in subsection B, the Director may disburse funds to any qualified organization to fund maintenance and care of additional historical African American graves in the Commonwealth that have been certified by the Department and documented in the Department’s cultural resources database. Funds disbursed under this subsection shall be disbursed at the rate set forth in subsection B.

A qualified organization receiving funds shall expend the funds for the routine maintenance of its historical African American cemetery, associated graves, and graves certified by the Department and documented in the Department’s cultural resources database and the erection of and caring for markers, memorials, and monuments to the memory of such African Americans.

Each qualified organization, through its proper officer, shall after July 1 of each year submit to the Director a certified statement that the funds appropriated to the organization during the preceding fiscal year were or will be expended for the purposes set forth in subsection D. No organization that fails to comply with any of the requirements of this section shall receive moneys allocated under this section for any subsequent fiscal year until the organization fully complies with the requirements.

In addition to funds that may be provided pursuant to subsection B or C, any organization that receives funds pursuant to subsection B or C may apply to the Director for a grant to perform extraordinary maintenance, renovation, repair, or reconstruction of any of its historical African American cemeteries and graves. However, a locality that is eligible for funding pursuant to subsection B or C may apply to the Director for such a grant without having received funding pursuant to subsection B or C. A locality's application for the grant shall not preclude another qualified organization from applying for funding pursuant to subsection B or C for the same cemetery or grave. A grant smade pursuant to this subsection hall be made from any appropriation made available by the General Assembly for such purpose or from the Fund.

Any locality may receive and hold funds drawn pursuant to subsection B or C on behalf of any qualified organization until such time as the organization is able to receive or utilize such funds. No local matching funds shall be required for any grants made pursuant to this section.

The owner of a historical African American cemetery shall reasonably cooperate with a qualified organization that receives funds pursuant to subsection B or C.

IN THE COUNTY OF: NUMBER: Arlington Calloway Cemetery 29 Lomax Cemetery 66 Mount Salvation Cemetery 29 Buckingham Stanton Family Cemetery 36 Henrico East End Cemetery 4,875 Loudoun African-American Burial Ground for the Enslaved at Belmont 44 Mt. Zion Old School Baptist Church Cemetery 33 Montgomery Wake Forest Cemetery 40 Westview Cemetery 47 Pulaski New River Cemetery 33 West Dublin Cemetery 44 IN THE CITY OF: NUMBER: Alexandria Baptist Cemetery of the African American Heritage Park 28 Contrabands and Freedmen Cemetery 631 Douglass Cemetery 83 Lebanon Union Cemetery 53 Methodist Protestant Cemetery 1,134 Penny Hill Cemetery 14 Charlottesville Daughters of Zion Cemetery 192 Chesapeake Cuffeytown Cemetery 52 Hampton Bassette’s Cemetery 212 Elmerton Cemetery 339 Good Samaritan Cemetery 37 Pleasant Shade Cemetery 29 Queen Street Cemetery 14 Tucker Family Cemetery 15 Union Street Cemetery 125 Harrisonburg Newtown Cemetery 400 Martinsville Matthews Cemetery 8 The People’s Cemetery 178 Smith Street Cemetery 9 Portsmouth Mt. Calvary Cemetery 266 Radford Mountain View Cemetery 91 Richmond Evergreen Cemetery 2,100 Suffolk Oak Lawn Cemetery 468

History.

2017, c. 270; 2018, cc. 428, 433, 434, 614, 818; 2019, cc. 184, 251, 252, 257, 260, 268; 2020, cc. 82, 83, 455, 456.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 385 I, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “1. Included in this Item is $100,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year from the general fund to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves and cemeteries.

“2. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

., Code of Virginia, $34,875 the first year and $34,875 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at the East End Cemetery in Henrico County, Virginia and the Evergreen Cemetery in Richmond, Virginia.

“3.
Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

., Code of Virginia, $960 the first year and $960 the second year from the general fund is provided to to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at the Daughters of Zion Cemetery in Charlottesville, Virginia.

“4. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $1,330 the first year and $1,330 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at the Mt. Calvary Cemetery in Portsmouth, Virginia.

“5. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $385 the first year and $385 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at the African-American Burial Ground for the Enslaved at Belmont and Mt. Zion Old Baptist Church Cemetery in Loudoun County, Virginia.

“6. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $385 the first year and $385 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at the New River and West Dublin Cemeteries in Pulaski County, Virginia.

“7. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $2,340 the first year and $2,340 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at Oak Lawn Cemetery in Suffolk, Virginia.

“8. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $3,855 the first year and $3,855 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at the following cemeteries in Hampton Virginia: 212 graves at Bassonette’s Cemetery, 339 graves at Elmerton Cemetery, 14 graves at Queen Street Cemetery, 29 graves at Pleasant Shade Cemetery, 15 graves at the Tucker Family Cemetery, 125 graves at Union Street Cemetery and 37 graves at Good Samaritan Cemetery.

“9. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $975 the first year and $975 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at Matthews, People’s and Smith Street Cemeteries in Martinsville, Virginia.

“10. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $9,715 the first year and $9,715 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at six cemeteries in Alexandria, Virginia.

“11. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $485 the first year and $485 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at Wake Forest and Westview Cemeteries in Montgomery County, Virginia.

“12. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $455 the first year and $455 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at Mountain View Cemetery in Radford, Virginia.

“13. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $1,330 the first year and $1,330 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at Calloway, Lomax, and Mount Salvation Cemeteries in Arlington County, Virginia.

“14. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $2,000 the first year and $2,000 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at Newtown Cemetery in Harrisonburg, Virginia.

“15. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $260 the first year and $260 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at Cuffeytown Cemetery in Chesapeake, Virginia.

“16. Pursuant to §

10.1-2211.2

, Code of Virginia, $180 the first year and $180 the second year from the general fund is provided to support the preservation and care of historical African American graves at Stanton Family Cemetery in Buckingham County, Virginia.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 428 added the entry for “Charlottesville; Daughters of Zion Cemetery” in the table in subsection B.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 433 and 434 are identical, and inserted the entry for “Portsmouth; Mt. Calvary Cemetery” in the table in subsection B.

The 2018 amendment by c. 614 added the entry for “Loudoun; African-American Burial Ground for the Enslaved at Belmont” to the table in subsection B.

The 2018 amendment by c. 818 substituted “Qualified organization” for “Qualified charitable organization” throughout; in the definition of “Historical African American cemetery,” deleted “and is owned by a public body or qualified charitable organization” at the end; in the definition of “Qualified organization,” inserted “or any person or locality that owns a historical African American cemetery”; inserted the first sentence in subsection F; added subsection G.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 184, in the table in subsection B, inserted the entries for the County of Pulaski.

The 2019 amendment by c. 251 added the entry for “Oak Lawn Cemetery” in the City Suffolk to the table in subsection B.

The 2019 amendment by c. 252 inserted the three entries for the City of Martinsville to the table in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 257 and 268 are identical, and added the seven entries for the City of Hampton to the table in subsection B.

The 2019 amendment by c. 260, in the table in subsection B, inserted the entries for the City of Alexandria.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 82, in the table in subsection B, added the entries for the County of “Montgomery” and the City of “Radford.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 83, added entry for “Mt. Zion Old School Baptist Church Cemetery” in the County of Loudoun to the table in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 455 and 456 are identical, and in subsection A, added the definition for “Fund”; in subsection B, added “to the Department” and substituted “for the purpose of maintaining qualifying cemeteries and graves pursuant to this section” for “in favor of the treasurer of a qualified organization caring for any cemetery set forth in this subsection” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, deleted “as set forth opposite the cemetery name or” preceding “as documented” in the fourth sentence, added the last sentence before the table, and in the table, added the rows for the counties of Arlington and Buckingham and the cities of Chesapeake and Harrisonburg; added a new section C and redesignated accordingly; in subsection D, substituted “cemetery, associated graves, and graves certified by the Department and documented in the Department’s cultural resources database” for “cemetery and its graves”; in subsection E, substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C”; in subsection F, inserted “or C” twice, substituted “that receives funds pursuant to” for “set forth in” in the first sentence and added “or from the Fund” to the last sentence; and in subsections G and H, inserted “or C” once in each subsection.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 187 and 450 are identical, and substituted “were interred in such cemetery prior to January 1, 1948” for “lived at any time between January 1, 1800, and January 1, 1900” in subsection B in the introductory language.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 540 and 541 are identical, and added “or any locality whose purpose for applying for funding pursuant to this section is to maintain a neglected historical African American cemetery, or a portion thereof, that is located within its jurisdictional bounds” in the third paragraph of subsection A; in subsection F, inserted the second and third sentences, and substituted “A grant made pursuant to this subsection shall” for “Such a grant shall” in the last sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-2211.2.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Disbursement of funds appropriated for caring for historical African American cemeteries and graves.

For purposes of this section:

“Fund”
means the Historical African American Cemeteries and Graves Fund created pursuant to §

10.1-2211.3

.

“Historical African American cemetery”
means a cemetery that was established prior to January 1, 1948, for interments of African Americans.

“Qualified organization”
means a charitable corporation, charitable association, or charitable trust that has been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and whose primary purpose is the preservation of historical cemeteries and graves, any person or locality that owns a historical African American cemetery, or any locality whose purpose for applying for funding pursuant to this section is to maintain a neglected historical African American cemetery, or a portion thereof, that is located within its jurisdictional bounds.

At the direction of the Director, the Comptroller of the Commonwealth shall draw an annual warrant upon the State Treasurer from any sum that may be provided to the Department in the general appropriation act for the purpose of maintaining qualifying cemeteries and graves pursuant to this section. Any representative of a qualified organization desiring to receive funding from such appropriation for the maintenance of qualifying cemeteries and graves pursuant to this section shall submit an application to the Department on or before May 30 each year. Such appropriations shall be allocated on the basis of the number of graves, monuments, and markers in a cemetery of African Americans who were interred in such cemetery prior to January 1, 1948, the dates to be determined by reference to grave markers or, at the discretion of the Director, other historical records. Such number of graves, monuments, and markers, as documented by the qualified organization, shall be multiplied by the rate of $5 or the average actual cost of routine maintenance of a grave, monument, or marker, whichever is greater, to determine the amount of the allocation. The Department shall determine the average actual cost of routine maintenance of a grave, monument, or marker in a biennial survey of at least four properly maintained cemeteries, each located in a different geographical region of the Commonwealth. The Director shall deposit any appropriated funds that are not disbursed during the same fiscal year into the Fund.

Click to view

In addition to any sum provided to a qualified organization as set forth in subsection B, the Director may disburse funds to any qualified organization to fund maintenance and care of additional historical African American graves in the Commonwealth that have been certified by the Department and documented in the Department’s cultural resources database. Funds disbursed under this subsection shall be disbursed at the rate set forth in subsection B.

A qualified organization receiving funds shall expend the funds for the routine maintenance of its historical African American cemetery, associated graves, and graves certified by the Department and documented in the Department’s cultural resources database and the erection of and caring for markers, memorials, and monuments to the memory of such African Americans.

Each qualified organization, through its proper officer, shall after July 1 of each year submit to the Director a certified statement that the funds appropriated to the organization during the preceding fiscal year were or will be expended for the purposes set forth in subsection D. No organization that fails to comply with any of the requirements of this section shall receive moneys allocated under this section for any subsequent fiscal year until the organization fully complies with the requirements.

In addition to funds that may be provided pursuant to subsection B or C, any organization that receives funds pursuant to subsection B or C may apply to the Director for a grant to perform extraordinary maintenance, renovation, repair, or reconstruction of any of its historical African American cemeteries and graves. However, a locality that is eligible for funding pursuant to subsection B or C may apply to the Director for such a grant without having received funding pursuant to subsection B or C. A locality’s application for the grant shall not preclude another qualified organization from applying for funding pursuant to subsection B or C for the same cemetery or grave. A grant shall be made from any appropriation made available by the General Assembly for such purpose or from the Fund.

Any locality may receive and hold funds drawn pursuant to subsection B or C on behalf of any qualified organization until such time as the organization is able to receive or utilize such funds. No local matching funds shall be required for any grants made pursuant to this section.

The owner of a historical African American cemetery shall reasonably cooperate with a qualified organization that receives funds pursuant to subsection B or C.

IN THE COUNTY OF: NUMBER: Arlington Calloway Cemetery 29 Lomax Cemetery 66 Mount Salvation Cemetery 29 Buckingham Stanton Family Cemetery 36 Henrico East End Cemetery 4,875 Loudoun African-American Burial Ground for the Enslaved at Belmont 44 Mt. Zion Old School Baptist Church Cemetery 33 Montgomery Wake Forest Cemetery 40 Westview Cemetery 47 Pulaski New River Cemetery 33 West Dublin Cemetery 44 IN THE CITY OF: NUMBER: Alexandria Baptist Cemetery of the African American Heritage Park 28 Contrabands and Freedmen Cemetery 631 Douglass Cemetery 83 Lebanon Union Cemetery 53 Methodist Protestant Cemetery 1,134 Penny Hill Cemetery 14 Charlottesville Daughters of Zion Cemetery 192 Chesapeake Cuffeytown Cemetery 52 Hampton Bassette’s Cemetery 212 Elmerton Cemetery 339 Good Samaritan Cemetery 37 Pleasant Shade Cemetery 29 Queen Street Cemetery 14 Tucker Family Cemetery 15 Union Street Cemetery 125 Harrisonburg Newtown Cemetery 400 Martinsville Matthews Cemetery 8 The People’s Cemetery 178 Smith Street Cemetery 9 Portsmouth Mt. Calvary Cemetery 266 Radford Mountain View Cemetery 91 Richmond Evergreen Cemetery 2,100 Suffolk Oak Lawn Cemetery 468

History.

2017, c. 270; 2018, cc. 428, 433, 434, 614, 818; 2019, cc. 184, 251, 252, 257, 260, 268; 2020, cc. 82, 83, 455, 456; 2022, cc. 187, 450, 540, 541.

§ 10.1-2211.3.
Historical African American Cemeteries and Graves Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Historical African American Cemeteries and Graves Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds appropriated for such purpose, all funds deposited in the Fund pursuant to subsection B or C of §

10.1-2211.2

, and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set out in subsections B and C of §

10.1-2211.2

. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

History.

2020, cc. 455, 456.

§ 10.1-2212.
Listing of certain historical societies receiving appropriations.

At the direction of the Director, the Comptroller of the Commonwealth is instructed and empowered to draw annual warrants upon the State Treasurer, as provided in the general appropriations act, in favor of the treasurers of certain historical societies, museums, foundations, and associations for use in caring for and maintaining collections, exhibits, sites, and facilities owned by such historical organizations, specified as follows:

Virginia Historical Society. For aid in maintaining Battle Abbey at Richmond.

Confederate Museum at Richmond. For the care of Confederate collections and maintenance of the Virginia Room.

Valentine Museum at Richmond. For providing exhibits to the public schools of Virginia.

Woodrow Wilson Birthplace Foundation, Incorporated. To aid in restoring and maintaining the Woodrow Wilson home at Staunton.

Robert E. Lee Memorial Association, Incorporated. To aid in further development of “Stratford” in Westmoreland County.

Poe Foundation, Incorporated. To aid in maintaining the Poe Shrine at Richmond.

Patrick Henry Memorial Foundation at Brookneal. To aid in maintaining home.

Hanover County Branch, Association for the Preservation of Virginia Antiquities. To aid in maintaining the Patrick Henry home at “Scotchtown” in Hanover County.

Historic Lexington Foundation. To aid in restoration and maintenance of the Stonewall Jackson home at Lexington.

“Oatlands,” Incorporated. To aid in maintaining “Oatlands” in Loudoun County.

Montgomery County Branch, Association for the Preservation of Virginia Antiquities. To aid in maintaining Smithfield Plantation House.

The Last Capitol of the Confederacy. For the preservation of the Last Capitol of the Confederacy in Danville.

Association for the Preservation of Virginia Antiquities. For assistance in maintaining certain historic landmarks throughout the Commonwealth.

The Corporation for Jefferson’s “Poplar Forest.” To aid in restoring, maintaining, and operating “Poplar Forest,” Thomas Jefferson’s Bedford County home.

Belle Grove, Incorporated. To aid in providing educational programs for Virginia students.

George Washington’s Fredericksburg Foundation. To aid in the restoration and perpetuation of “Ferry Farm,” George Washington’s boyhood home.

Montpelier National Trust for Historic Preservation. To aid in restoring, maintaining, and operating Montpelier, the lifelong home of President James Madison, in Orange County.

Eastern Shore of Virginia Historical Society. To aid in restoring, maintaining and operating Kerr Place in Accomack County.

New Town Improvement and Civic Club, Inc. To aid in restoring, maintaining and operating Little England Chapel, a landmark to Hampton’s first generation of freedmen, in the City of Hampton.

Woodlawn Plantation. To aid in the preservation and maintenance of Woodlawn Plantation.

Friends of Historic Huntley. To support the research and preservation of Historic Huntley Mansion.

Menokin Foundation, Incorporated. To aid in further development of Menokin, home of Francis Lightfoot Lee.

Historic Gordonsville, Inc., the owner of the Gordonsville Exchange Hotel. To aid in maintaining the Gordonsville Exchange Hotel and in providing educational programs for Virginia’s students.

Organizations receiving state funds as provided for in this section shall certify to the satisfaction of the Department that matching funds from local or private sources are available in an amount at least equal to the amount of the request in cash or in kind contributions which are deemed acceptable to the Department.

Requests for funding of historical societies or like organizations as set forth in subsection A shall be considered by the Governor and the General Assembly only in even-numbered years.

History.

1981, c. 537, § 10-145.12; 1984, cc. 2, 528, 563, 750; 1987, c. 481; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-813; 1989, cc. 656, 711; 1990, c. 817; 1993, c. 264; 1994, cc. 162, 495; 1995, c. 28; 1996, cc. 227, 420; 1998, c. 172; 2000, cc. 7, 18.

Cross references.

As to the availability of state funds to nonstate agencies, see § 2.2-1505.

The 1998 amendment

substituted “Kenmore Association, Inc.” for “George Washington Boyhood Home Foundation” in subdivision A 16.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 7 and 18 are identical, and substituted “George Washington’s Fredericksburg Foundation” for “Kenmore Association, Inc.” in subdivision A 16.